Illinois, session 104th, HB4784.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-2.03 and by adding Section 5-2.03a as 6follows: 7    (305 ILCS 5/5-2.03)8    Sec. 5-2.03. Presumptive eligibility. Except as provided 9in Section 5-2.03a Beginning on the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly and except where 11federal law requires presumptive eligibility, no adult may be 12presumed eligible for medical assistance under this Code and 13the Department may not cover any service rendered to an adult 14unless the adult has completed an application for benefits, 15all required verifications have been received, and the 16Department or its designee has found the adult eligible for 17the date on which that service was provided. Nothing in this 18Section shall apply to pregnant women or to persons enrolled 19under the medical assistance program due to expansions 20approved by the federal government that are financed entirely 21by units of local government and federal matching funds.22(Source: P.A. 96-1501, eff. 1-25-11; 97-687, eff. 6-14-12.)   HB4784- 2 -LRB104 18736 KTG 32179 b1    (305 ILCS 5/5-2.03a new)2    Sec. 5-2.03a. Redeterminations of eligibility for certain 3persons.4    (a) Any person who was initially determined to be eligible 5for medical assistance and is receiving institutional services 6or home and community-based services as authorized under this 7Article shall be presumed eligible for a continuation of 8coverage for such services during any redetermination process, 9unless the person experiences a material change in financial 10circumstances that results in the loss of eligibility.11    (b) If the person experiences a material change in 12financial circumstances that results in the loss of 13eligibility, the person, or the person's designated caregiver 14or responsible party, shall notify the Department. The 15Department may conduct a redetermination of eligibility. If a 16redetermination is conducted, the Department must send written 17notice to the person or to the person's designated caregiver 18or responsible party:19        (1) before the commencement of any redetermination; 20    and21        (2) upon conclusion of the redetermination, including 22    the results and the effective date of any eligibility 23    change.24    (c) No later than January 1, 2028, the Department shall 25seek federal authorization to exempt persons with disabilities 26who are eligible for medical assistance from annual   HB4784- 3 -LRB104 18736 KTG 32179 b1redeterminations of eligibility, except that a full 2redetermination shall be conducted at least once every 5 3years, regardless of whether a material change in financial 4circumstances has occurred.5    (d) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 6implement the provisions of this Section.